apertium-leu.leu.lexd
LEXICON Verbs
bäi:bäi # to not want
bit:bit # to lie
boak:boak # to grow (trees not people)
box:box # like/want
dãrum:dãrum # pacify
dif:dif # dig
doxot:doxot # go with/accompany
du:du # jump down 
fafanãi:fafanãi # entrust
falim:falim # watch 
falis:falis # crawl using more than two legs 
falou:falou # charge/attack
famäus:famäus # decorate
fapaxalaye:fapaxalaye # dry/wipe off water
fapaläu:fapaläu # get away 
#fapaläwane:fapaläwane # get *it* away 
faräm:faräm # burn / singe
fasäl:fasäl # miss the mark
fasuye:fasuye # plant taro stick
fatäxapine:fatäxapine # finish *it*
fatis:fatis # show (what is theirs)
fädui:fädui # jump down *on* (to cause to)
fäf:fäf # cook (in a mumu)
fägutäi:fägutäi # strengthen
fäxälit:fäxälit # show 
fäxäradak:fäxäradak # straight (to cause to be)
fäxätaj:fäxätaj # lookafter (because they are yours)
fäxäulat:fäxäulat # surround/encircle
fäxovul:fäxovul # come together
fäisox:fäisox # work
fäla:fäla # run
fälak:fälak # put on/through/into
fälapok:fälapok # run *quickly*
fälet:fälet # go
fäni:fäni # climb
fäjafus:fäjafus # rest/relieve oneself
fäjasik:fäjasik # help(from the outside) (consumated by sitting down and eating together ?)
fäpiti:fäpiti # teach
fäpoxoi:fäpoxoi # drop on (from your hands)
färajät:färajät # smoulder
färoxoye:färoxoye # correct (to cause to be)
fäsot:fäsot # sell
fätateaxe:fätateaxe # trust
fätexäsäu:fätexäsäu # inform (me)
fäyof:fäyof #shelter (from the rain)
fegan:fegan # go pull
fexaxäsane:fexaxäsane # measure it
feirin:feirin # heal
femaralie:femaralie # cross at (with him)
fenäu:fenäu # steal
fej:fej # send (a person)
feo:feo # whistle
fepätoxäne:fepätoxäne # divide it
fepialäi:fepialäi # talk rubbish
fepil:fepil # discuss
ferawäi:ferawäi # speak
ferawäyane:ferawäyane # cause sound
feruma:feruma # join together
fesiaxe:fesiaxe # get
fetamäi:fetamäi # marry (go to a man's place to live) 
fetok:fetok #argue
feväl:feväl # carry (on the ends of a pole)
fevis:fevis # fight
feyuf:feyuf # pull (in the opposite directions)
fiäi:fiäi # ask
filimän:filimän # come
firis:firis # carry (trumpline style)
fït:fït # blow
folas:folas # smell
fomax:fomax # finish
fot:fot # fishing (with two hand nets)
fotapiak:fotapiak # rupture
fua:fua # bare fruit
fui:fui # remove (stones from mumu)
fula:fula # play around
fuje:fuje # hang up (to dry)
fün:fün # hide
gan:gan # gather up
gas:gas # get fire
giak:giak # push down
gis:gis # squirm
gogoj:gogoj # sweep
gon:gon # clean (with a broom)
gurum:gurum # break
gün:gün # go (generally)
xäfane:xäfane # bury (man)
xäfe:xäfe # carry (slung over shoulder)
xäfute:xäfute # cover
xäxäfa:xäxäfa # surfing on a plank 
xäkäpine:xäkäpine # carry (under arm)
xälak:xälak # wait
xäle:xäle # write
xälie:xälie # recognize 
xälum:xälum # look
xämaxe:xämaxe # scrub
xäote:xäote # pick fruit (with a pole)
xärak:xärak # drown 
xäres:xäres # fade/change color
xätaj:xätaj # watch out for / babysit 
xätipe:xätipe # cut (a net)
xäul:xäul # paddle 
xäute:xäute # tie/make a net
xäuye:xäuye # open
xävaj:xävaj # help 
xävise:xävise # carry (on back as baby)
xese:xese # strip bark (with a knife) 
xet:xet # bite
xiaxe:xiaxe # push him down 
xidarak:xidarak # get light (false dawn/before sun comes up)
xile:xile # dig up (kaukau)
xis:xis # return/bring back
xiute:xiute # strangle (with a rope, as in shark catching)
xoaf:xoaf # stare
xoxol:xoxol # change 
xol:xol # change (check here)
xonof:xonof # scale a fish 
xop:xop # chase
xos:xos # peal (with a knife)
xukune:xukune # shake/mix it
xup:xup # bark
xuput:xuput # puncture 
xuräu:xuräu # play / do nothing
xus:xus # tell/say
irimäi:irimäi # sit/talk
kapis:kapis # plant 
kas:kas # open 
kawäs:kawäs # mess up 
käf:käf # dig 
käis:käis # float 
käliu:käliu # wander / circle
kämal:kämal # crawl (on hands and feet)
käpase:käpase # buy a pig (for a funeral)
kät:kät # count
käwa:käwa # put in 
ket:ket # tear
laxäu:laxäu # step over 
lapasa:lapasa # join 
läk:läk # go up 
lämak:lämak # fishing (with torch, at night)
lämon:lämon # think
#lämon fäulie:lämon fäulie # remember
lämone:lämone # decide
läjäi:läjäi # hear/listen
lep:lep # wave (in the air)
levagoi:levagoi # duck
lif:lif # fly
liliuane:liliuane # sling (to throw with a sling)
lip:lip # cut (grass)
#lisan fäulie:lisan fäulie # return (it)
lisane:lisane # bring
luak:luak # vomit
luloak:luloak # give birth (human)
lus:lus # stink
mafiu:mafiu # stink
maxaraf:maxaraf # sweat
maxarak:maxarak # itch 
malit:malit # (to) not (be) here
malos:malos # deflate
marän:marän # buy 
masasäf:masasäf # (not) sleep well
matifesäl:matifesäl # join / overlap 
mägit:mägit # make coconut milk 
#mäxus:mäxus # short wind (adj? short winded?) 
mämaluf:mämaluf # forget 
mämäxus:mämäxus # grieve 
mät:mät # die 
mätef:mätef # sleep 
mäti:mäti # lie down 
#mäti fäpet: mäti fäpet # lean against 
meleskäk:meleskäk # swing 
mia:mia # urinate 
miluj:miluj # mistake/error
mimit:mimit # pinch to break 
misij:misij # smell 
mulox:mulox # grieve/worry 
mulus:mulus # untie 
muneta:muneta # don't leave alone 
musajin:musajin # smell
nanomäi:nanomäi # imagine 
najan:najan # laugh 
näi:näi # sit 
num:num # drink 
nuj:nuj # ask a favor / pray to spirit 
nupox:nupox # turn over 
nus:nus # rub 
nuyen:nuyen # spread out 
jan:jan # eat / chew 
jas:jas # tear down 
jädarak:jädarak # break in two (not necesarily equal halves)
jäjäul:jäjäul # fish with line / day dream 
jäs:jäs # swim under water 
jätaj:jätaj # watchout for 
jojäu:jojäu # talk in sleep 
jojolän:jojolän # not recognize 
jujan:jujan # heal 

LEXICON Conjuctions
ej:ej # and
xena:xena # for/in order to 

LEXICON Adjectives
dadoxot:dadoxot # sticky
fafajan:fafajan # sharp
fatak:fatak # straight
fägala:fägala # noisy (could potentially mean noisily)
fägut:fägut # hard/strong
fäui:fäui # new/young
feipul:feipul # unexpected/accidental
fevuän:fevuän # spouses (two)
fomirak:fomirak # small
futäi:futäi # bubbling 
gïs:gïs # sick
x'anaful:x'anaful # round/circular
xäxäluf:xäxäluf # short 
xäkäras:xäkäras # slippery
xälelef:xälelef # light/not heavy 
xäliu:xäliu # round
#xäliu xoläi:xäliu xoläi # round about 
xäpiak:xapiak # all/all of us finished
xäsano:xäsano # some
xäves:xäves # plenty
xävul:xävul # naked 
#xiu fämak:xiu fämak # last of all
xïs:xïs # yellow/orange
xolij:xolij # crooked / not straight 
xurul:xurul # whole 
käri:käri # sorry
laxaf:laxaf # hot
laxäi:laxäi # hungry
laj:laj # shining 
läva:läva # big 
lilivus:lilivus # heavy
luäi:luäi # quiet / calm / peaceful
malalaga:malalaga # thin
marala:marala # angry 
mararol:mararol # quiet
maso:maso # ripe / ready
matak:matak # not ready / not ripe 
matäut:matäut # afraid 
matoxol:matoxol # ripe 
mäxawa:mäxawa # blue / green 
mäxäta:mäxäta # black 
mälit:mälit # loose, unresponsible 
mälmäl:mälmäl # tired, soft 
mämälui:mämälui # soft, spongey 
mäna:mäna # all 
märafut:märafut # sweet, refreshing, cool, wet 
märip:märip # smooth 
mäsat:mäsat # clear (after a rain)
mäsi:mäsi # full 
mätafan:mätafan # heavy 
meräu:meräu # happy 
modak:modak # small thing 
modus:modus # tall/long thing 
mopäk:mopäk # bitter
mü:mü # all 
näf:näf # enough 
joj:joj # crazy 

LEXICON Adverbs
fatäpus:fatäpus #quickly
fädak:fädak # slowly
färoxo:färoxo # properly
fäsäxa:fäsäxa #easily/one time/once
fexaxäs:fexaxäs # enough/able
fepox:fepox # about 
fulä:fulä # again/more
funä:funä # usually
xäsam:xäsam # quietly
xoläi:xoläi # about (position)
lasun:lasun # long way
legaf:legaf # with difficulty
lunäi:lunäi # yet/still
mäs:mäs # must 

LEXICON Prepositions
fäsilak:fäsilak # close/near
xä:xä # benefactive relator (for)
xe:xe # to/toward
xoluna:xoluna # on top of it 
xovul:xovul # together 
ina:ina # of
kol:kol # westward
lasavul:lasavul # inside of corner 
lä:lä # to/at/in
lämalei:lämelai # (to the) outside 
lämina:lämina # (at/to) behind (it)
läna:läna # (at/to) insidelänona:länona # (at/to) infront (it)
läpia:läpia # (at/to) under (at/to the ground)
lätana:lätana # (at/to) beside (it)
läui:läui # up/up in
lu:lu # over there (used with directional words)
malän:malän # like/same as 
näbe:näbe # here 

LEXICON Questions
aso:aso # what
asotobok:asotobok #what kind
fä:fä # where
xenaso:xenaso # why 
laso:laso # when 
mäläfa:mäläfa # how
näse:näse # who 

LEXICON Pronouns
i:i # 3rd person singular
näme:näme # 2nd pl du
nämi:nämi # 2nd pl pl 
nämutul:nämutul # 2nd pl tree
näne:näne # 3rd sg
näno:näno # 2nd sg 
näri:näri # 3rd pl pl 
närie:närie # 3rd pl du 
närutul:närutul # 3rd pl tr 
nemäm:nemäm # 1st pl ex pl 
nemäme:nemäme # 1st pl ex du 
nemätul:nemätul # 1st pl ex tr 
nenia:nenia # 1st sg 
netära:netära # 1st pl in pl 
netäre:netäre # 1st pl in du
netätul:netätul # 1st pl in tr 

LEXICON Aspect
fo:fo #past tense

LEXICON time
lanef:lanef # yesterday 
lumui:lumui # behind/following/(after?)

LEXICON Misc
fäxärus:fäxärus # long time (yet to come)
lävaxas:lävaxas # alright/ok, cat: ex(pression?)


PATTERN Number
Numeral [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
/([0123456789])+/
/([0123456789])+[.,]([0123456789])+/

LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
